North Carolina, session 2025, HB787.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:

PART I. PARENTAL SAVINGS TRUST FUND MATCHING PROGRAM
SECTION 1.(a) G.S. 116-209.25 is amended by adding the following new
subsection to read:
"(e1) Matching Program. – The Authority shall establish a matching program for
contributions made by eligible persons who open an education savings and investment plan
account qualified under section 529 of the Internal Revenue Code to contribute funds to the
Parental Savings Trust Fund for qualifying students. As part of the Program, the Authority shall
provide matching contributions of one hundred dollars ($100.00) for every fifty dollars ($50.00)
contributed by an eligible person, up to five hundred dollars ($500.00) per year. Matching funds
shall be provided up to a maximum of one thousand five hundred dollars ($1,500) per qualifying
student. For purposes of this subsection, the following definitions shall apply:
(1) Eligible person. – A qualified parent or other interested party that meets all of
the following criteria:
a. Qualifies as a resident under the criteria set forth in G.S. 116-143.1
and in accordance with the coordinated and centralized residency
determination process administered by the Authority.
b. Has a household income not in excess of two hundred fifty percent
(250%) of the federal poverty guidelines.
(2) Program. – The matching program established pursuant to this subsection.
(3) Qualifying student. – An eligible student in accordance with section 529 of
the Code who meets all of the following criteria:
a. Qualifies as a resident under the criteria set forth in G.S. 116-143.1
and in accordance with the coordinated and centralized residency
determination process administered by the Authority.
b. Is 14 years of age or younger."
SECTION 1.(b) There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Board of
Governors of The University of North Carolina for the 2025-2026 fiscal year the sum of one
hundred eighty thousand dollars ($180,000) in recurring funds to be allocated to the State
*H787-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
Education Assistance Authority to provide matching contributions to the Parental Savings Trust
Fund pursuant to G.S. 116-209.25(e1), as enacted by subsection (a) of this section.
SECTION 1.(c) This section becomes effective July 1, 2025.

PART II. CREATE A TAX DEDUCTION FOR CERTAIN CONTRIBUTIONS TO
QUALIFIED TUITION PROGRAMS
SECTION 2.(a) G.S. 105-153.5(b) is amended by adding a new subdivision to read:
"(12a) An amount, not to exceed two thousand dollars ($2,000), contributed to an
account in the Parental Savings Trust Fund of the State Education Assistance
Authority established pursuant to G.S. 116-209.25. In the case of a married
couple filing a joint return, the maximum dollar amount of the deduction is
four thousand dollars ($4,000). The taxpayer shall add to adjusted gross
income the amount deducted in a prior taxable year under this subdivision to
the extent this amount was withdrawn from the Parental Savings Trust Fund
and not used to pay for the qualified higher education expenses of the
designated beneficiary, unless the withdrawal was made without penalty
under section 529 of the Code due to the death or permanent disability of the
designated beneficiary."
SECTION 2.(b) This section is effective for taxable years beginning on or after
January 1, 2026.

PART III. EFFECTIVE DATE
SECTION 3. Except as otherwise provided, this act is effective when it becomes
law.
Page 2 House Bill 787-First Edition